Utah statutes.
57-8a-206.   Written statement of unpaid assessment.

(1) (a)  The manager or board of directors shall issue a written statement indicating any unpaid assessment with respect to a lot covered by the request, upon:

(i)  the written request of any unit owner; and

(ii)  payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed $10.

(b)  The written statement described in Subsection (1)(a) is binding in favor of any person who relies in good faith on the written statement upon the:

(i)  remaining owners;

(ii)  manager; and

(iii)  board of directors.

(2)  Unless the manager or board of directors complies with a request described in Subsection (1)(a) within 10 days, any unpaid assessment that became due prior to the date the request described in Subsection (1)(a) was made is subordinate to a lien held by the person requesting the statement pursuant to Subsection (1)(a).

